Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4024
Violation; penalty.

Any person who violates the Tobacco Products Tax Act or any person who sells, delivers, or accepts tobacco products with the intent to evade the act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 24.